Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.06.210

Issuance of shares.

(1) The powers granted in this section to the board of directors may be reserved to the shareholders by the articles of incorporation.

(2) Any issuance of shares must be approved by the board of directors. Shares may be issued:

(a) For consideration determined by the board of directors from time to time consisting of any tangible or intangible property or benefit to the corporation, including cash, promissory notes, services performed, contracts for services to be performed, or other securities of the corporation; or

(b) As a share dividend or upon a stock split, reclassification of outstanding shares into shares of another class or series, or conversion of outstanding shares into shares of another class or series.

(3) A good faith determination by the board of directors that the consideration received or to be received for the shares to be issued is adequate is conclusive insofar as the adequacy of consideration relates to whether the shares are validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable. When the board of directors has made such a determination and the corporation has received the consideration, the shares issued therefor are fully paid and nonassessable. Shares issued as a share dividend or upon a stock split, reclassification of outstanding shares into shares of another class or series, or conversion of outstanding shares into shares of another class or series are fully paid and nonassessable.

(4) The corporation may place in escrow shares issued for a contract for future services or benefits or a promissory note, or make other arrangements to restrict the transfer of the shares, and may credit distributions in respect to the shares against their purchase price, until the services are performed, the benefits are received, or the note is paid. If the services are not performed, the benefits are not received, or the note is not paid, the shares escrowed or restricted and the distributions credited may be canceled in whole or part.

(5) Where it cannot be determined that outstanding shares are fully paid and nonassessable, there shall be a conclusive presumption that such shares are fully paid and nonassessable if the board of directors makes a good faith determination that there is no substantial evidence that the full consideration for such shares has not been paid.

[ 2023 c 432 s 2; 2009 c 189 s 8; 1989 c 165 s 49.]